Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-503.02
Personal property; sale; procedure; other conveyance.

(1) The power of any city of the second class or village to convey any personal property owned by it shall be exercised by resolution directing the sale and the manner and terms of the sale. Following passage of the resolution directing the sale of the property, notice of the sale shall be posted in three prominent places within the city or village for a period of not less than seven days prior to the sale of the property. If the fair market value of the property is greater than five thousand dollars, notice of the sale shall also be published once in a legal newspaper published in or of general circulation in such city or village at least seven days prior to the sale of the property. The notice shall give a general description of the property offered for sale and state the terms and conditions of sale.

(2) Personal property may be conveyed notwithstanding the procedure in subsection (1) of this section when (a) such property is being sold in compliance with the requirements of federal or state grants or programs or (b) such property is being conveyed to another public agency.

Laws 2003, LB 476, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB28, § 1.